Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1852
Act; provisions controlling.

To the extent that the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act is inconsistent with any general statute or special act or parts thereof, the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act shall control.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 52.